Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3746
Commission; grower members; districts; processor members.

(1) The
Governor shall appoint one grower member from each of the following
four districts:

(a) District 1 which shall consist of the counties of Sioux, Dawes,
Sheridan, and Box Butte;

(b) District 2 which shall consist of the county of Scotts Bluff;

(c) District 3 which shall consist of the counties of Banner, Morrill,
Kimball, Cheyenne, Garden, and Deuel; and

(d) District 4 which shall consist of the remaining counties in which
dry bean production occurs in the state.

(2) The commission shall
appoint two grower members to the commission, one of whom resides within district
1 or 2 who shall represent districts 1 and 2 and one of whom resides within
district 3 or 4 who shall represent districts 3 and 4. Members serving as
representatives of such districts on May 18, 2011, shall continue as members
of the commission until the end of their terms and until their successors
are appointed and qualified and, except as provided in section 2-3748, shall
be eligible for reappointment.

(3) The three processor members of
the commission shall be appointed by the Governor. Insofar as possible, the
geographic locations of such appointed members shall be representative of
the Nebraska dry bean industry. Any processor may place his or her name on
a candidacy list for appointment by written notice to the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 145, § 12;

Laws 2011, LB394, § 2.